Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Comprehensive Planning.

Sec. 47.18.010.
Development of statewide plan.

With the advice of the Alaska Human Relations Commission, the department shall develop a comprehensive statewide plan to ensure the effectiveness and efficiency of state programs that relate to the prevention of adolescent pregnancy and the provision of services to adolescent parents and their children under AS

47.18.100

—

47.18.140

, and to peer counseling under AS

47.18.200

.

The plan developed under (a) of this section must

review and include existing programs and services of state government;

examine and consider the achievements and experiences of projects that are similar to those authorized under AS

47.18.100

—

47.18.140

and

47.18.200

;

give priority to the consolidation and improvement of existing programs;

make recommendations with regard to the need for new or expanded programs and services within the existing level of funding;

consider the findings and recommendations of the Alaska’s Adolescent Pregnancy and Parenthood Task Force; and

make recommendations concerning the incremental implementation of the plan.

The Department of Education and Early Development, the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, and the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall assist the department in developing the plan required under (a) of this section. In addition, through appropriate means, the department shall solicit advice from teens, parents, educators, school administrators, taxpayers, civic groups, community organizations, Native organizations, officials of local governments, religious institutions, and other concerned persons about how state programs can be coordinated and operated in a manner that will enhance their effectiveness and efficiency in addressing the many needs associated with adolescent parenting, the prevention of adolescent pregnancies, and the provision of adolescent peer counseling.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1991; am E.O. No. 84 § 8 (1993))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (c) of this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with §§ 89 - 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999, and “Community and Regional Affairs” was changed to “Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 91(a)(14), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (c) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.